Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Penalties

272.990.
Penalties.

Any corporation, association or company using the word “cooperative” as part of its name in violation of KRS

272.044

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and may be enjoined from doing business under that name by any corporation, or stockholder thereof, organized under KRS

272.020

to

272.044

.

Any individual or any corporation whose officers or employees knowingly induce or attempt to induce any member to break his marketing contract with an association or who maliciously and knowingly spreads false reports about the finances or management of any association shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense, and shall be liable to the association aggrieved in a civil suit in the penal sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person conducting a warehouse in this state who persuades or permits any member of any association to breach his marketing contract with the association by receiving his products for sale, auction or display contrary to the terms of any marketing contract of which the offender has notice shall be liable to the association aggrieved in a civil suit in the penal sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense, and shall also pay the association a reasonable attorney’s fee and all the costs of the action against him. The association may obtain an injunction against such warehouseman to prevent further breaches and a multiplicity of actions.

History.

883d-9, 883f-26, 883f-27; 2010, ch. 151, § 139, effective January 1, 2011.

272.991.
Additional penalties for violation of KRS 506.010, 506.030, 506.040, 521.020, or 521.050.

If a domestic cooperative corporation or association is convicted of a violation of KRS

506.010

,

506.030

,

506.040

,

521.020

, or

521.050

, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation or association is convicted of violating any section specified above under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the charter of the corporation or association be suspended for a period of not more than five (5) years for a first offense, ten (10) years for a second offense, and permanently for a third or subsequent offense.

If a foreign cooperative corporation or association is convicted of violating any section specified in subsection (1) of this section, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation or association violates any of those sections under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the corporation or association not be permitted to do business in Kentucky for the appropriate period specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The penalties specified in this section shall be in addition to any other penalty specified by law for the commission of the offenses listed in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 477, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.